Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-1202
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby
finds and declares that there currently exist and may hereafter exist conditions
which make it difficult for governmental units to issue and sell their bonds
or other evidences of indebtedness and to obtain credit at reasonable interest
rates and that the United States Government has authorized certain of its
agencies and instrumentalities to provide credit support for state and local
governmental units under more favorable terms.

Laws 2009, LB377, § 2.